California statutes. Public Utilities Code
In the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the authority may also provide for the call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon other terms as specified. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity, unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180256.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the authority, or at other places as may be designated, or at both the office and other places at the option of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180257.

The bonds, or each series of bonds, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson, vice chairperson, or other authorized officer of the authority and the auditor-controller of the authority, and the official seal, if any, of the authority shall be attached.

The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the auditor-controller of the authority. All of the signatures and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced.

If any officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer
 had remained in office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 636, Sec. 3.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

180258.

The bonds may be sold as the authority determines by resolution, and the bonds may be sold at a price below par, whether by negotiated or public sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180259.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180260.

All accrued interest received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the authority and applied to
 secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of the outstanding bonds in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the authority. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   (AB 1919)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

180261.

(a) The authority may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the authority upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holder of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180262.

(a) The authority may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but which have not been sold or delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the authority available therefor, including the revenues from the tax. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the agency in anticipation of which the notes were issued. 

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of the bonds which the authority has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the authority may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180263.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued under this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

180264.

Any action or proceedings wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Sacramento Transportation Authority [180300. - 180305.]

180300.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In the County of Sacramento, the authority seeks to address local transportation needs by raising additional local revenue to fund transportation projects and programs.

(b) Constitutional voting thresholds applicable to local taxes have created challenges for the adoption of countywide sales tax measures. The adoption of this chapter is intended, in part, to allow the authority to seek voter approval of a transportation improvement sales tax in a portion of the county.

(c) The County of Sacramento is unique in
 having a large, developed unincorporated population and seven cities with older commercial corridors that have potential for infill but which regularly experience construction-related disruptions and pavement deterioration. To reduce these localized impacts and limit the need for future transportation system expansion, the authority must be able to fund coordinated infrastructure improvements that support infill development as part of a single project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

180301.

Unless expressly stated in this chapter, the provisions set forth in this division apply to the authority. This chapter is not intended to limit or otherwise conflict with the other provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

180302.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Active transportation” means infrastructure facilities or services that encourage increased use of active modes of transportation, such as biking and walking, and includes projects consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 2382 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) “Authority” means the Sacramento Transportation Authority created in 1988 pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 180050).

(c) “CARTA” means the Capital Area Regional Tolling Authority.

(d) “Expenditure plan” means a county transportation expenditure plan adopted in connection with a transactions and use tax ordinance pursuant to Section 180206.

(e) “Governing board” means the governing board of the authority.

(f) “Member” or “member of the governing board” means an individual county supervisor or city council member who has been appointed to the governing board, or their alternate.

(g) “Ordinance” means a transactions and use tax ordinance authorized pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 180200).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

180303.

(a) The authority may issue bonds to finance costs of high-occupancy toll lanes or other toll facilities within the County of Sacramento approved by the California Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 149.7 of the Streets and Highways Code, including, without limitation, working capital costs, costs of issuance and credit enhancement, capitalized interest, and all reserves and other fees or costs related to the bonds. Those bonds may be payable from toll revenue or any other funds lawfully available to the authority for such purposes, including sales tax revenue, development impact fees, or state and federal grant funds.

(b) Before the authority issues bonds
 payable from toll revenue for a toll facility operated by CARTA, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The authority shall enter into an agreement with CARTA regarding the application of toll revenue to pay for bonds issued by the authority.

(2) The governing board of CARTA shall review and approve a toll facility expenditure plan.

(c) Bonds issued pursuant to this section may be sold pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in a resolution adopted by the governing board. Bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing board, which resolution shall state the maximum principal amount of the bonds, the maximum term of the bonds, and the maximum rate of interest to
 be paid on the bonds, not to exceed the maximum rate permitted by law. Any bond issued pursuant to this section shall not constitute a debt or liability of the state and shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect:
“Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of principal or interest of this bond.”
(d) The maximum rate of interest payable upon the bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not exceed the maximum rate specified in Section 53531 of the Government Code. The rate may be either fixed or variable and shall be payable at the times and in the manner specified in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

180304.

(a) The allowable expenditure categories set forth in Section 180205 shall also include the construction, modernization, and improvement of infrastructure that supports infill or transit-oriented development, in areas nominated by local governments, and included in regionally adopted plans that advance state greenhouse gas emissions reduction objectives.

(b) (1) The authority may only allocate revenues for a facility described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) if that facility is combined with a project that includes a facility described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(2) An expenditure plan shall not allocate more than 5 percent of the total revenues derived from the tax for facilities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(c) For purposes of this section, “infrastructure” means any of the following:

(1) Transportation facilities, as allowable under Section 180205.

(2) Water, stormwater, wastewater, or other utility-related facilities.

(d) This section does not apply to a retail transactions and use tax approved by the electors before January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

180305.

(a) (1) An ordinance and corresponding expenditure plan may be imposed by the authority in a geographic area that comprises less than the total area of the County of Sacramento, including its incorporated cities, subject to the guidelines set forth in subdivision (c). 

(2) An ordinance and expenditure plan described in paragraph (1) shall be adopted by at least a two-thirds vote of the total membership of the governing board.

(3) An ordinance described in paragraph (1) shall be subject to voter approval by the electors in the area to which the tax applies.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 180102, if an ordinance and expenditure plan for a portion of the County of Sacramento are approved pursuant to the process set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 180200), all subsequent governing board decisions and actions related to implementation of that ordinance and expenditure plan, including an action to amend the expenditure plan pursuant to Section 180207, shall be made by a majority of both of the following:

(1) Those members representing the city or cities subject to the ordinance, if any.

(2) All members appointed from the board of supervisors.

(c) The governing board shall determine the area to which the
 tax would apply before the electors vote on the measure. If the tax only applies to a portion of the county, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The incorporated area of a city within the county shall be either wholly included or wholly excluded from the area to be taxed.

(2) The unincorporated area of the county shall either be wholly included or wholly excluded from the area to be taxed.

(3) The area to be taxed shall include at least the incorporated area from two cities or the incorporated area from one city and the unincorporated area from the county.

(d) All
 revenues derived from the tax shall be expended for the primary benefit of the portion of the county in which the tax is imposed. Expenditures made within that portion of the county are deemed to confer a primary benefit. The authority shall, as part of the expenditure plan, adopt objective eligibility guidelines that define primary benefit. The expenditure plan, including those guidelines, shall be made readily accessible to voters in the manner required by Section 180203. Any revenues derived from the tax shall supplement, and
 not supplant, other transportation revenues available to the portion of the county to which the tax applies.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 180206, an expenditure plan applicable to a portion of the county shall not be adopted until it has received the approval of the board of supervisors and of the city councils representing both a majority of the cities included within the area subject to the tax and a majority of the population residing in the incorporated areas subject to the tax.

(f) Unless otherwise stated in this chapter, the other provisions of this division that apply to an ordinance and expenditure plan shall also apply to an ordinance and expenditure plan applicable to a portion of the county, including the authority to issue bonds pursuant to
 Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 180250).

(g) The term “district,” as defined and used in Sections 7252, 7261, and 7262 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall not be interpreted to preclude the authority from imposing a transactions and use tax in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) in an area that comprises less than the total geographic jurisdiction of the authority, so long as all other applicable requirements of that law are complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19.1. SONOMA COUNTY REGIONAL CLIMATE PROTECTION AUTHORITY [181000. - 181015.]

181000.

The Sonoma County Regional Climate Protection Authority is hereby created. For the purposes of this division, “authority” means the Sonoma County Regional Climate Protection Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181001.

The authority is a public instrumentality governed by the same board as that governing the Sonoma County Transportation Authority. The authority is, however, a separate entity from the Sonoma County Transportation Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181003.

The authority, in cooperation with local agencies that elect to participate, may perform coordination and implementation activities, within the boundaries of Sonoma County, to assist those agencies in meeting their greenhouse gas emission reduction goals as set forth in resolutions and adopted plans and develop, coordinate, and implement programs and policies to comply with Chapter 488 of the Statutes of 2006 and other federal or
 state mandates and programs designed to respond to greenhouse gas emissions and climate change. “Local agency,” as used in this division, shall mean a county, city, whether general law or chartered, city and county, town, school district, municipal corporation, district, political subdivision, or any board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181004.

Activities authorized under Section 181003 shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Reduction of energy consumption.

(b) Coordination and implemention of energy efficiency projects.

(c) Increasing efficiency of water use.

(d) Utilizing carbon sequestration opportunities.

(e) Administration of grants to local entities.

(f) Alternative transportation options.

(g) Measuring and quantifying ongoing greenhouse gas reductions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181005.

The authority shall adopt rules for its proceedings consistent with the laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181006.

A majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the authority require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181007.

The acts of the authority shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181008.

All meetings of the authority shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181009.

The authority shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which prescribes the powers and duties of the authority officers, the method of appointment of the authority employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the authority.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the authority to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this
 division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181010.

The members of the authority shall be compensated as determined by the authority and shall be reimbursed for necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with performing authority duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181011.

(a) Notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code not later than 15 days prior to the hearing.

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181012.

The authority may sue and be sued, except as provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181013.

All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein, or by other statute or regulation expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181014.

The authority may apply for funds available to carry out its functions and may receive grants of funds to carry out its functions. All funds available to the authority shall be held in a separate account and accounted for independently. No transportation funds may be used for purposes of this division other than those activities of the authority related to transportation. No funding from the Traffic Relief Act for Sonoma County (Measure M), approved by voters in 2004 shall be used for the purpose of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

181015.

Nothing in this division shall supersede or interfere with activities, plans, or actions of other local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 881)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19.5. CALIFORNIA HIGH-SPEED RAIL SERVICE [185000. - 185511.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions,Findings, and Definitions [185000. - 185012.]

185000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California High-Speed Rail Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

185010.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California, over the past decades, has built an extensive network of freeways and airports to meet the state’s growing transportation needs.

(b) These facilities are not adequate to meet the mobility needs of the current population.

(c) The population of the state and the travel demands of its citizens are expected to continue to grow at a rapid rate.

(d) The cost of expanding the current network of highways and airports fully to meet current and future transportation needs is prohibitive, and a total expansion strategy would be detrimental to air quality.

(e) Intercity rail service, when coordinated with urban transit and airports, is an efficient, practical, and less polluting transportation mode that can fill the gap between future demand and present capacity.

(f) Advances in rail technology have allowed intercity rail systems in Europe and Japan to attain speeds of up to 200 miles per hour and compete effectively with air travel for trips in the 200 to 500-mile range.

(g) Development of a high-speed rail system is a necessary and viable alternative to automobile and air travel in the state.

(h) In order for the state to have a comprehensive network of high-speed intercity rail systems by the year 2020, it must begin preparation of a high-speed intercity rail plan similar to California’s former freeway plan and designate an entity with stable and predictable funding sources to implement the plan.

(i) Utilizing existing human and manufacturing resources to build a large network of high-speed rail systems will generate jobs and economic growth for today’s population and produce a transportation network for future generations.

(j) Upon confirmation of the need and costs by detailed studies, the private sector, together with the state, can build and operate new high-speed intercity rail systems utilizing private and public financing.

(k) The existing high-speed rail commission is completing its work and a successor authority to continue planning is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

185012.

As used in this division, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authority” means the High-Speed Rail Authority.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(c) “High-speed rail” means intercity passenger rail service that utilizes an alignment and technology that makes it capable of sustained speeds of 200 miles per hour or greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The High-Speed Rail Authority [185020. - 185024.]

185020.

(a) There is in the Transportation Agency a High-Speed Rail Authority.

(b) (1) The authority is composed of 11 members as follows:

(A) Five members appointed by the Governor.

(B) Two members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(C) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(D) One Member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and one Member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly shall be ex officio members without vote and shall
 participate in the activities of the authority to the extent that participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature.

(2) For the purposes of making appointments to the authority pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1), the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall take into consideration geographical diversity to ensure that all regions of the state are adequately represented.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), and until their successors are appointed, members of the authority, other than members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b),
 shall hold office for terms of four years. A vacancy shall be filled by the appointing power making the original appointment, by appointing a member to serve the remainder of the term or, in the case of a member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, at the pleasure of the Speaker of the Assembly.

(d) (1) In order to provide for evenly staggered terms, persons appointed or reappointed to the authority by the Governor and the Senate Committee on Rules after January 1, 2001, shall be appointed to initial terms to expire as follows:

(A) Of the five persons appointed by the Governor, one shall be appointed to a term that expires on December 31, 2002, one shall be appointed to a term that expires on December 31, 2003, one shall be appointed to a term that expires on December 31, 2004, and two shall be appointed to terms that expire on December 31, 2005.

(B) Of the two persons appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one shall be appointed to a term that expires on December 31, 2002, and one shall be appointed to a term that expires on December 31, 2004.

(2) Following expiration of each of the initial terms provided for in this subdivision, the term shall expire every four years thereafter on December 31.

(e) Members of the authority are subject to the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(f) From among its voting members, the authority shall elect a chairperson, who shall preside at all meetings of the authority, and a vice chairperson to preside in the absence of the chairperson. The chairperson shall serve a term of one year.

(g) Five voting members of the authority constitute a quorum for taking any action by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   (AB 1831)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

185022.

(a) Each voting member of the authority shall receive compensation of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day that the member is attending to the business of the authority, but shall not receive more than five hundred dollars ($500) in any calendar month.

(b) Voting members of the authority shall be reimbursed for their actual travel expenses incurred in attending to the business of the
 authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

185024.

(a) The authority shall appoint an executive director, exempt from civil service, who shall serve at the pleasure of the authority, to administer the affairs of the authority as directed by the authority.

(b) For purposes of managing and administering the ongoing work of the authority in implementing the high-speed train project, the Governor, upon the recommendation of the executive director, may appoint up to six additional individuals, exempt from civil service, who shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director. Pursuant to this subdivision, the Governor may appoint persons only for the following positions:

(1) Chief program manager.

(2) Up to three regional directors.

(3) Chief financial officer.

(4) Director of risk management and project controls.

(c) The compensation of the executive director and the additional persons authorized by subdivision (b) shall be established by the authority, and approved by the Department of Human Resources, in an amount that is reasonably necessary, in the discretion of the authority, to attract and hold a person of superior qualifications. The authority shall cause to be conducted, through the use of independent outside advisers, a salary survey to determine the compensation for the positions under this subdivision. The Department of Human Resources may, in its discretion, accept a previously completed salary survey that meets the requirements of this
 subdivision, and shall review the methodology used in the survey. The salary survey shall consider both of the following:

(1) Other state, regional, and local transportation agencies that are most comparable to the authority and its responsibilities.

(2) Other relevant labor pools.

The compensation set by the authority shall not exceed the highest comparable compensation for a position of that type, as determined by the salary survey. Based on the salary survey, these positions shall be paid a salary established by the authority and approved by the Department of Human Resources.

(d) The executive director may, as authorized by the authority, appoint necessary staff to carry out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 188.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Responsibilities of the Authority [185030. - 185038.]

185030.

The authority shall direct the development and implementation of intercity high-speed rail service that is fully integrated with the state’s existing intercity rail and bus network, consisting of interlinked conventional and high-speed rail lines and associated feeder buses. The intercity network in turn shall be fully coordinated and connected with commuter rail lines and urban rail transit lines developed by local agencies, as well as other transit services, through the use of common station facilities whenever possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

185032.

Upon an appropriation in the Budget Act for that purpose, the authority shall prepare a plan for the construction and operation of a high-speed train network for the state, consistent with and continuing the work of the Intercity High-Speed Rail Commission conducted prior to January 1, 1997. The plan shall include an appropriate network of conventional intercity passenger rail service and shall be coordinated with existing and planned commuter and urban rail systems.

(a) The authorization and responsibility for planning, construction, and operation of high-speed passenger train service at speeds exceeding 125 miles per hour in this state is exclusively granted to the authority.

(b) Except as provided in paragraph (2), nothing in this subdivision precludes other local, regional, or state agencies from exercising powers provided by law with regard to planning or operating, or both, passenger rail service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 166.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185033.

(a) The authority shall prepare, publish, adopt, and submit to the Legislature, not later than May 1, 2014, and every two years thereafter, a business plan. At least 60 days prior to the publication of the plan, the authority shall publish a draft business plan for public review and comment. The draft plan shall also be submitted to the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing, the Assembly Committee on Transportation, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Assembly Committee on Budget.

(b) (1) The business plan shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(A) A description of the
 type of service the authority is developing and the proposed chronology for the construction of the statewide high-speed rail system, and the estimated capital costs for each segment or combination of segments.

(B) A forecast of the expected patronage, service levels, and operating and maintenance costs for the Phase 1 corridor as identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 of the Streets and Highways Code and by each segment or combination of segments for which a project level environmental analysis is being prepared for Phase 1. The forecast shall assume a high, medium, and low level of patronage and a realistic operating planning scenario for each level of service.

(C) Alternative financial scenarios for different levels of service, based on the patronage forecast in subparagraph (B), and the operating break-even points for each alternative. Each scenario
 shall assume the terms of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 2704.08 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(D) The expected schedule for completing environmental review, and initiating and completing construction for each segment or combination of segments of Phase 1.

(E) An estimate and description of the total anticipated federal, state, local, and other funds the authority intends to access to fund the construction and operation of the system, and the level of confidence for obtaining each type of funding.

(F) Any written agreements with public or private entities to fund components of the high-speed rail system, including stations and terminals, and any impediments to the completion of the system.

(G) Alternative
 public-private development strategies for the implementation of Phase 1.

(H) A discussion of all reasonably foreseeable risks the project may encounter, including, but not limited to, risks associated with the project’s finances, patronage, right-of-way acquisition, environmental clearances, construction, equipment, and technology, and other risks associated with the project’s development. The plan shall describe the authority’s strategies, processes, or other actions it intends to utilize to manage those risks.

(2) To the extent feasible, the business plan should draw upon information and material developed according to other requirements, including, but not limited to, the preappropriation review process and the preexpenditure review process in the Safe, Reliable High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Act for the 21st Century pursuant to Section 2704.08 of the Streets and Highways
 Code. The authority shall hold at least one public hearing on the business plan and shall adopt the plan at a regularly scheduled meeting. When adopting the plan, the authority shall take into consideration comments from the public hearing and written comments that it receives in that regard, and any hearings that the Legislature may hold prior to adoption of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 237, Sec. 6.   (AB 528)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

185033.5.

On or before March 1, 2017, and every two years thereafter, the authority shall provide a project update report, approved by the Secretary of Transportation as consistent with the criteria in this section, to the budget committees and the appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature, on the development and implementation of intercity high-speed train service pursuant to Section 185030. The report, at a minimum, shall include a programwide summary, as well as details by project segment, with all information necessary to clearly describe the status of the project, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A summary describing the overall progress of the project.

(b) The
 baseline budget for all project phase costs, by segment or contract, beginning with the California High-Speed Rail Program Revised 2012 Business Plan.
